Florida, session 2026, SB238.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 55 56 Section 1.âParagraph (z) of subsection (1) of section 57 220.03, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (gg) is 58 added to that subsection, to read: 59 220.03âDefinitions.â 60 (1)âSPECIFIC TERMS.âWhen used in this code, and when not 61 otherwise distinctly expressed or manifestly incompatible with 62 the intent thereof, the following terms shall have the following 63 meanings: 64 (z)ââTaxpayerâ means any corporation subject to the tax 65 imposed by this code, and includes all corporations that are 66 members of a unitary combined group for which a consolidated 67 return is filed under s. 220.131. However, the term âtaxpayerâ 68 does not include a corporation having no individuals, (including 69 individuals employed by an affiliate,) receiving compensation in 70 this state as defined in s. 220.15 when the only property owned 71 or leased by the said corporation, (including an affiliate,) in 72 this state is located at the premises of a printer with which it 73 has contracted for printing, if such property consists of the 74 final printed product, property which becomes a part of the 75 final printed product, or property from which the printed 76 product is produced. 77 (gg)ââUnitary combined groupâ means a group of corporations 78 related through common ownership whose business activities are 79 integrated with, dependent upon, or contribute to a flow of 80 value among members of the group. 81 Section 2.âSection 220.13, Florida Statutes, is amended to 82 read: 83 220.13ââAdjusted federal incomeâ defined.â 84 (1)âThe term âadjusted federal incomeâ means an amount 85 equal to the taxpayerâs taxable income as defined in subsection 86 (2), or such taxable income of a unitary combined group more 87 than one taxpayer as provided in s. 220.1363 s. 220.131, for the 88 taxable year, adjusted as follows: 89 (a)âAdditions.âThere shall be added to such taxable income: 90 1.a.âThe amount of any tax upon or measured by income, 91 excluding taxes based on gross receipts or revenues, paid or 92 accrued as a liability to the District of Columbia or any state 93 of the United States which is deductible from gross income in 94 the computation of taxable income for the taxable year. 95 b.âNotwithstanding sub-subparagraph a., if a credit taken 96 under s. 220.1875, s. 220.1876, s. 220.1877, or s. 220.1878 is 97 added to taxable income in a previous taxable year under 98 subparagraph 11. and is taken as a deduction for federal tax 99 purposes in the current taxable year, the amount of the 100 deduction allowed shall not be added to taxable income in the 101 current year. The exception in this sub-subparagraph is intended 102 to ensure that the credit under s. 220.1875, s. 220.1876, s. 103 220.1877, or s. 220.1878 is added in the applicable taxable year 104 and does not result in a duplicate addition in a subsequent 105 year. 106 2.âThe amount of interest which is excluded from taxable 107 income under s. 103(a) of the Internal Revenue Code or any other 108 federal law, less the associated expenses disallowed in the 109 computation of taxable income under s. 265 of the Internal 110 Revenue Code or any other law, excluding 60 percent of any 111 amounts included in alternative minimum taxable income, as 112 defined in s. 55(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, if the 113 taxpayer pays tax under s. 220.11(3). 114 3.âIn the case of a regulated investment company or real 115 estate investment trust, an amount equal to the excess of the 116 net long-term capital gain for the taxable year over the amount 117 of the capital gain dividends attributable to the taxable year. 118 4.âThat portion of the wages or salaries paid or incurred 119 for the taxable year which is equal to the amount of the credit 120 allowable for the taxable year under s. 220.181. This 121 subparagraph shall expire on the date specified in s. 290.016 122 for the expiration of the Florida Enterprise Zone Act. 123 5.âThat portion of the ad valorem school taxes paid or 124 incurred for the taxable year which is equal to the amount of 125 the credit allowable for the taxable year under s. 220.182. This 126 subparagraph shall expire on the date specified in s. 290.016 127 for the expiration of the Florida Enterprise Zone Act. 128 6.âThe amount taken as a credit under s. 220.195 which is 129 deductible from gross income in the computation of taxable 130 income for the taxable year. 131 7.âThat portion of assessments to fund a guaranty 132 association incurred for the taxable year which is equal to the 133 amount of the credit allowable for the taxable year. 134 8.âIn the case of a nonprofit corporation which holds a 135 pari-mutuel permit and which is exempt from federal income tax 136 as a farmersâ cooperative, an amount equal to the excess of the 137 gross income attributable to the pari-mutuel operations over the 138 attributable expenses for the taxable year. 139 9.âThe amount taken as a credit for the taxable year under 140 s. 220.1895. 141 10.âUp to nine percent of the eligible basis of any 142 designated project which is equal to the credit allowable for 143 the taxable year under s. 220.185. 144 11.âAny amount taken as a credit for the taxable year under 145 s. 220.1875, s. 220.1876, s. 220.1877, or s. 220.1878. The 146 addition in this subparagraph is intended to ensure that the 147 same amount is not allowed for the tax purposes of this state as 148 both a deduction from income and a credit against the tax. This 149 addition is not intended to result in adding the same expense 150 back to income more than once. 151 12.âThe amount taken as a credit for the taxable year under 152 s. 220.196. The addition in this subparagraph is intended to 153 ensure that the same amount is not allowed for the tax purposes 154 of this state as both a deduction from income and a credit 155 against the tax. The addition is not intended to result in 156 adding the same expense back to income more than once. 157 13.âThe amount taken as a credit for the taxable year 158 pursuant to s. 220.198. 159 14.âThe amount taken as a credit for the taxable year 160 pursuant to s. 220.1915. 161 15.âThe amount taken as a credit for the taxable year 162 pursuant to s. 220.199. 163 16.âThe amount taken as a credit for the taxable year 164 pursuant to s. 220.1991. 165 (b)âSubtractions.â 166 1.âThere shall be subtracted from such taxable income: 167 a.âThe net operating loss deduction allowable for federal 168 income tax purposes under s. 172 of the Internal Revenue Code 169 for the taxable year, 170 b.âThe net capital loss allowable for federal income tax 171 purposes under s. 1212 of the Internal Revenue Code for the 172 taxable year, 173 c.âThe excess charitable contribution deduction allowable 174 for federal income tax purposes under s. 170(d)(2) of the 175 Internal Revenue Code for the taxable year, and 176 d.âThe excess contributions deductions allowable for 177 federal income tax purposes under s. 404 of the Internal Revenue 178 Code for the taxable year. 179 180 However, a net operating loss and a capital loss shall never be 181 carried back as a deduction to a prior taxable year, but all 182 deductions attributable to such losses shall be deemed net 183 operating loss carryovers and capital loss carryovers, 184 respectively, and treated in the same manner, to the same 185 extent, and for the same time periods as are prescribed for such 186 carryovers in ss. 172 and 1212, respectively, of the Internal 187 Revenue Code. A deduction is not allowed for excess charitable 188 contribution deductions, net operating losses, net capital loss 189 carrybacks or carryovers, or contributions to certain employee 190 plans under 26 U.S.C. ss. 170(d)(2), 172, 1212, and 404, 191 respectively, for a member of a unitary combined group which is 192 not a United States member. Carryovers of excess charitable 193 contribution deductions, net operating losses, net capital loss 194 carrybacks or carryovers, or contributions to certain employee 195 plans under 26 U.S.C. ss. 170(d)(2), 172, 1212, and 404, 196 respectively, may be subtracted only by the member of the 197 unitary combined group which generates a carryover. 198 2.âThere shall be subtracted from such taxable income any 199 amount to the extent included therein the following: 200 a.âDividends treated as received from sources without the 201 United States, as determined under s. 862 of the Internal 202 Revenue Code. 203 b.âAll amounts included in taxable income under s. 78, s. 204 951, or s. 951A of the Internal Revenue Code. 205 206 However, any amount subtracted under this subparagraph is 207 allowed only to the extent such amount is not deductible in 208 determining federal taxable income. As to any amount subtracted 209 under this subparagraph, there shall be added to such taxable 210 income all expenses deducted on the taxpayerâs return for the 211 taxable year which are attributable, directly or indirectly, to 212 such subtracted amount. Further, no amount shall be subtracted 213 with respect to dividends paid or deemed paid by a Domestic 214 International Sales Corporation. 215 3.âAmounts received by a member of a unitary combined group 216 as dividends paid by another member of the unitary combined 217 group must be subtracted from the taxable income to the extent 218 that the dividends are included in the taxable income. 219 4.âIn computing âadjusted federal incomeâ for taxable years 220 beginning after December 31, 1976, there shall be allowed as a 221 deduction the amount of wages and salaries paid or incurred 222 within this state for the taxable year for which no deduction is 223 allowed pursuant to s. 280C(a) of the Internal Revenue Code 224 (relating to credit for employment of certain new employees). 225 5.4.âThere shall be subtracted from such taxable income any 226 amount of nonbusiness income included therein. 227 6.5.âThere shall be subtracted any amount of taxes of 228 foreign countries allowable as credits for taxable years 229 beginning on or after September 1, 1985, under s. 901 of the 230 Internal Revenue Code to any corporation which derived less than 231 20 percent of its gross income or loss for its taxable year 232 ended in 1984 from sources within the United States, as 233 described in s. 861(a)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, not 234 including credits allowed under ss. 902 and 960 of the Internal 235 Revenue Code, withholding taxes on dividends within the meaning 236 of sub-subparagraph 2.a., and withholding taxes on royalties, 237 interest, technical service fees, and capital gains. 238 7.6.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this code, 239 except with respect to amounts subtracted pursuant to 240 subparagraphs 1. and 4. 3., any increment of any apportionment 241 factor which is directly related to an increment of gross 242 receipts or income which is deducted, subtracted, or otherwise 243 excluded in determining adjusted federal income shall be 244 excluded from both the numerator and denominator of such 245 apportionment factor. Further, all valuations made for 246 apportionment factor purposes shall be made on a basis 247 consistent with the taxpayerâs method of accounting for federal 248 income tax purposes. 249 (c)âInstallment sales occurring after October 19, 1980.â 250 1.âIn the case of any disposition made after October 19, 251 1980, the income from an installment sale shall be taken into 252 account for the purposes of this code in the same manner that 253 such income is taken into account for federal income tax 254 purposes. 255 2.âAny taxpayer who regularly sells or otherwise disposes 256 of personal property on the installment plan and reports the 257 income therefrom on the installment method for federal income 258 tax purposes under s. 453(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall 259 report such income in the same manner under this code. 260 (d)âNonallowable deductions.âA deduction for net operating 261 losses, net capital losses, or excess contributions deductions 262 under ss. 170(d)(2), 172, 1212, and 404 of the Internal Revenue 263 Code which has been allowed in a prior taxable year for Florida 264 tax purposes shall not be allowed for Florida tax purposes, 265 notwithstanding the fact that such deduction has not been fully 266 utilized for federal tax purposes. 267 (e)âAdjustments related to federal acts.âTaxpayers shall be 268 required to make the adjustments prescribed in this paragraph 269 for Florida tax purposes with respect to certain tax benefits 270 received pursuant to the Economic Stimulus Act of 2008; the 271 American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009; the Small 272 Business Jobs Act of 2010; the Tax Relief, Unemployment 273 Insurance Reauthorization, and Job Creation Act of 2010; the 274 American Taxpayer Relief Act of 2012; the Tax Increase 275 Prevention Act of 2014; the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 276 2016; the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017; and the Coronavirus 277 Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act of 2020. 278 1.a.âThere shall be added to such taxable income an amount 279 equal to 100 percent of any amount deducted for federal income 280 tax purposes as bonus depreciation for the taxable year pursuant 281 to ss. 167 and 168(k) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 282 amended by s. 103 of Pub. L. No. 110-185; s. 1201 of Pub. L. No. 283 111-5; s. 2022 of Pub. L. No. 111-240; s. 401 of Pub. L. No. 284 111-312; s. 331 of Pub. L. No. 112-240; s. 125 of Pub. L. No. 285 113-295; s. 143 of Division Q of Pub. L. No. 114-113; and s. 286 13201 of Pub. L. No. 115-97, for property placed in service 287 after December 31, 2007, and before January 1, 2027. 288 b.âFor the taxable year and for each of the 6 subsequent 289 taxable years, there shall be subtracted from such taxable 290 income an amount equal to one-seventh of the amount by which 291 taxable income was increased pursuant to this subparagraph, 292 notwithstanding any sale or other disposition of the property 293 that is the subject of the adjustments and regardless of whether 294 such property remains in service in the hands of the taxpayer. 295 c.âThe provisions of sub-subparagraph b. do not apply to 296 amounts by which taxable income was increased pursuant to this 297 subparagraph for amounts deducted for federal income tax 298 purposes as bonus depreciation for qualified improvement 299 property as defined in s. 168(e)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code 300 of 1986, as amended by s. 13204 of Pub. L. No. 115-97. 301 2.âThere shall be added to such taxable income an amount 302 equal to 100 percent of any amount in excess of $128,000 303 deducted for federal income tax purposes for the taxable year 304 pursuant to s. 179 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 305 amended by s. 102 of Pub. L. No. 110-185; s. 1202 of Pub. L. No. 306 111-5; s. 2021 of Pub. L. No. 111-240; s. 402 of Pub. L. No. 307 111-312; s. 315 of Pub. L. No. 112-240; and s. 127 of Pub. L. 308 No. 113-295, for taxable years beginning after December 31, 309 2007, and before January 1, 2015. For the taxable year and for 310 each of the 6 subsequent taxable years, there shall be 311 subtracted from such taxable income one-seventh of the amount by 312 which taxable income was increased pursuant to this 313 subparagraph, notwithstanding any sale or other disposition of 314 the property that is the subject of the adjustments and 315 regardless of whether such property remains in service in the 316 hands of the taxpayer. 317 3.âThere shall be added to such taxable income an amount 318 equal to the amount of deferred income not included in such 319 taxable income pursuant to s. 108(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue 320 Code of 1986, as amended by s. 1231 of Pub. L. No. 111-5. There 321 shall be subtracted from such taxable income an amount equal to 322 the amount of deferred income included in such taxable income 323 pursuant to s. 108(i)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 324 as amended by s. 1231 of Pub. L. No. 111-5. 325 4.âFor taxable years beginning after December 31, 2018, and 326 before January 1, 2021, there shall be added to such taxable 327 income an amount equal to the excess, if any, of: 328 a.âOne hundred percent of any amount deducted for federal 329 income tax purposes as business interest expense for the taxable 330 year pursuant to s. 163(j) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 331 as amended by s. 2306 of Pub. L. No. 116-136; over 332 b.âOne hundred percent of the amount that would be 333 deductible for federal income tax purposes as business interest 334 expense for the taxable year if calculated pursuant to s. 163(j) 335 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended by s. 13301 of 336 Pub. L. No. 115-97. 337 338 Any expense added back pursuant to this subparagraph shall be 339 treated as a disallowed business expense carryforward from prior 340 years for the year or years following the addition, until such 341 time as the expense has been used. 342 5.âWith respect to qualified improvement property as 343 defined in s. 168(e)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 344 amended by s. 13204 of Pub. L. No. 115-97, that was placed in 345 service on or after January 1, 2018: 346 a.âThere shall be added to such taxable income an amount 347 equal to 100 percent of any amount deducted for federal income 348 tax purposes under s. 167(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 349 1986. There shall be subtracted an amount equal to the amount of 350 depreciation that would have been deductible pursuant to s. 351 167(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 in effect on January 352 1, 2020 and without regard to s. 2307 of Pub. L. No. 116-136, 353 notwithstanding any sale or other disposition of the property 354 that is the subject of the adjustments and regardless of whether 355 such property remains in service in the hands of the taxpayer. 356 b.âThe department may adopt rules necessary to administer 357 the provisions of this subparagraph, including rules, forms, and 358 guidelines for computing depreciation on qualified improvement 359 property, as defined in s. 168(e)(6) of the Internal Revenue 360 Code of 1986. 361 6.âFor taxable years beginning after December 31, 2020, and 362 before January 1, 2026, the changes made to the Internal Revenue 363 Code by Pub. L. No. 116-260, Division EE, Title I, s. 116 and 364 Title II, s. 210 shall not apply to this chapter. Taxable income 365 under this section shall be calculated as though changes made by 366 those sections were not made to the Internal Revenue Code. The 367 Department of Revenue may adopt rules necessary to administer 368 the provisions of this subparagraph, including rules, forms, and 369 guidelines for treatment of expenses and depreciation related to 370 these changes. 371 7.âSubtractions available under this paragraph may be 372 transferred to the surviving or acquiring entity following a 373 merger or acquisition and used in the same manner and with the 374 same limitations as specified by this paragraph. 375 8.âThe additions and subtractions specified in this 376 paragraph are intended to adjust taxable income for Florida tax 377 purposes, and, notwithstanding any other provision of this code, 378 such additions and subtractions shall be permitted to change a 379 taxpayerâs net operating loss for Florida tax purposes. 380 (2)âFor purposes of this section, a taxpayerâs taxable 381 income for the taxable year means taxable income as defined in 382 s. 63 of the Internal Revenue Code and properly reportable for 383 federal income tax purposes for the taxable year, but subject to 384 the limitations set forth in paragraph (1)(b) with respect to 385 the deductions provided by ss. 172 (relating to net operating 386 losses), 170(d)(2) (relating to excess charitable 387 contributions), 404(a)(1)(D) (relating to excess pension trust 388 contributions), 404(a)(3)(A) and (B) (to the extent relating to 389 excess stock bonus and profit-sharing trust contributions), and 390 1212 (relating to capital losses) of the Internal Revenue Code, 391 except that, subject to the same limitations, the term: 392 (a)ââTaxable income,â in the case of a life insurance 393 company subject to the tax imposed by s. 801 of the Internal 394 Revenue Code, means life insurance company taxable income; 395 however, for purposes of this code, the total of any amounts 396 subject to tax under s. 815(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code 397 pursuant to s. 801(c) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not 398 exceed, cumulatively, the total of any amounts determined under 399 s. 815(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended, 400 from January 1, 1972, to December 31, 1983; 401 (b)ââTaxable income,â in the case of an insurance company 402 subject to the tax imposed by s. 831(b) of the Internal Revenue 403 Code, means taxable investment income; 404 (c)ââTaxable income,â in the case of an insurance company 405 subject to the tax imposed by s. 831(a) of the Internal Revenue 406 Code, means insurance company taxable income; 407 (d)ââTaxable income,â in the case of a regulated investment 408 company subject to the tax imposed by s. 852 of the Internal 409 Revenue Code, means investment company taxable income; 410 (e)ââTaxable income,â in the case of a real estate 411 investment trust subject to the tax imposed by s. 857 of the 412 Internal Revenue Code, means the income subject to tax, computed 413 as provided in s. 857 of the Internal Revenue Code; 414 (f)ââTaxable income,â in the case of a corporation which is 415 a member of an affiliated group of corporations filing a 416 consolidated income tax return for the taxable year for federal 417 income tax purposes, means taxable income of such corporation 418 for federal income tax purposes as if such corporation had filed 419 a separate federal income tax return for the taxable year and 420 each preceding taxable year for which it was a member of an 421 affiliated group, unless a consolidated return for the taxpayer 422 and others is required or elected under s. 220.131; 423 (g)ââTaxable income,â in the case of a cooperative 424 corporation or association, means the taxable income of such 425 organization determined in accordance with the provisions of ss. 426 1381-1388 of the Internal Revenue Code; 427 (h)ââTaxable income,â in the case of an organization which 428 is exempt from the federal income tax by reason of s. 501(a) of 429 the Internal Revenue Code, means its unrelated business taxable 430 income as determined under s. 512 of the Internal Revenue Code; 431 (i)ââTaxable income,â in the case of a corporation for 432 which there is in effect for the taxable year an election under 433 s. 1362(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, means the amounts 434 subject to tax under s. 1374 or s. 1375 of the Internal Revenue 435 Code for each taxable year; 436 (j)ââTaxable income,â in the case of a limited liability 437 company, other than a limited liability company classified as a 438 partnership for federal income tax purposes, as defined in and 439 organized pursuant to chapter 605 or qualified to do business in 440 this state as a foreign limited liability company or other than 441 a similar limited liability company classified as a partnership 442 for federal income tax purposes and created as an artificial 443 entity pursuant to the statutes of the United States or any 444 other state, territory, possession, or jurisdiction, if such 445 limited liability company or similar entity is taxable as a 446 corporation for federal income tax purposes, means taxable 447 income determined as if such limited liability company were 448 required to file or had filed a federal corporate income tax 449 return under the Internal Revenue Code; 450 (k)ââTaxable income,â in the case of a taxpayer liable for 451 the alternative minimum tax as defined in s. 55 of the Internal 452 Revenue Code, means the alternative minimum taxable income as 453 defined in s. 55(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, less the 454 exemption amount computed under s. 55(d) of the Internal Revenue 455 Code. A taxpayer is not liable for the alternative minimum tax 456 unless the taxpayerâs federal tax return, or related federal 457 consolidated tax return, if included in a consolidated return 458 for federal tax purposes, reflect a liability on the return 459 filed for the alternative minimum tax as defined in s. 55(b)(2) 460 of the Internal Revenue Code; 461 (l)ââTaxable income,â in the case of a taxpayer whose 462 taxable income is not otherwise defined in this subsection, 463 means the sum of amounts to which a tax rate specified in s. 11 464 of the Internal Revenue Code plus the amount to which a tax rate 465 specified in s. 1201(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code are 466 applied for federal income tax purposes. 467 Section 3.âSection 220.131, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 468 Section 4.âSection 220.136, Florida Statutes, is created to 469 read: 470 220.136âDetermination of the members of a unitary combined 471 group.âA corporation having 50 percent or more of its 472 outstanding voting stock directly or indirectly owned or 473 controlled by a unitary combined group is considered a member of 474 the unitary combined group. A corporation having less than 50 475 percent of its outstanding voting stock directly or indirectly 476 owned or controlled by a unitary combined group is considered a 477 member of the unitary combined group if the business activities 478 of the corporation are of such a nature that the corporation is 479 considered functionally integrated with, and therefore a member 480 of, the unitary combined group. All of the income of a 481 corporation that is a member of a unitary combined group is 482 unitary. For purposes of this section, the attribution rules of 483 26 U.S.C. s. 318 must be used to determine whether voting stock 484 is indirectly owned. 485 Section 5.âSection 220.1363, Florida Statutes, is created 486 to read: 487 220.1363âUnitary combined groups; special requirements.â 488 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âunitary combined 489 reporting methodâ means a method used to determine the taxable 490 business profits of a group of entities conducting a unitary 491 business. Under this method, the net income of the entities must 492 be added together, along with the additions and subtractions 493 under s. 220.13, and apportioned to this state as a single 494 taxpayer under ss. 220.15 and 220.151. However, each special 495 industry member included in a unitary combined group return 496 which would otherwise be permitted to use a special method of 497 apportionment under s. 220.151 shall convert its single-factor 498 apportionment to a three-factor apportionment of property, 499 payroll, and sales. The special industry member shall calculate 500 the denominator of its property, payroll, and sales factors in 501 the same manner as those denominators are calculated by members 502 that are not special industry members. The numerator of sales, 503 property, and payroll factors is the product of the denominator 504 of each factor multiplied by the premiums or revenue-miles 505 factor ratio otherwise applicable under s. 220.151. 506 (2)âAll members of a unitary combined group must use the 507 unitary combined reporting method, under which all of the 508 following apply: 509 (a)âAdjusted federal income, for purposes of s. 220.12, is 510 the sum of adjusted federal income of all members of the unitary 511 combined group as determined for a concurrent taxable year. 512 (b)âThe numerators and denominators of the apportionment 513 factors must be calculated for all members of the unitary 514 combined group combined. 515 (c)âIntercompany sales transactions between members of the 516 unitary combined group are not included in the numerator or 517 denominator of the sales factor under ss. 220.15 and 220.151, 518 regardless of whether indicia of a sale exist. 519 (d)âFor sales of intangibles, including, but not limited 520 to, accounts receivable, notes, bonds, and stock, which are made 521 to entities outside the group, only the net proceeds are 522 included in the numerator and denominator of the sales factor. 523 524 As used in this subsection, the term âsaleâ includes, but is not 525 limited to, loans, payments for the use of intangibles, 526 dividends, and management fees. 527 (3)(a)âIf a parent corporation is a member of the unitary 528 combined group and has nexus with this state, a single unitary 529 combined group return must be filed in the name and under the 530 federal employer identification number of the parent 531 corporation. If the unitary combined group does not have a 532 parent corporation, if the parent corporation is not a member of 533 the unitary combined group, or if the parent corporation does 534 not have nexus with this state, the members of the unitary 535 combined group must choose a member subject to the tax imposed 536 by this chapter to file the return. The members of the unitary 537 combined group may not choose another member to file a corporate 538 income tax return in subsequent years unless the filing member 539 does not maintain nexus with this state or does not remain a 540 member of the unitary combined group. The return must be signed 541 by an authorized officer of the filing member as the agent for 542 the unitary combined group. 543 (b)âIf members of a unitary combined group have different 544 taxable years, the taxable year of a majority of the members of 545 the unitary combined group is the taxable year of the unitary 546 combined group. If the taxable years of a majority of the 547 members of a unitary combined group do not correspond, the 548 taxable year of the member that files the return for the unitary 549 combined group is the taxable year of the unitary combined 550 group. 551 (c)1.âA member of a unitary combined group having a taxable 552 year that does not correspond to the taxable year of the unitary 553 combined group shall determine its income for inclusion on the 554 tax return of the unitary combined group using all of the 555 following: 556 a.âThe precise amount of taxable income received during the 557 months corresponding to the taxable year of the unitary combined 558 group, if the precise amount can be readily determined from the 559 memberâs books and records. 560 b.âThe taxable income of the member converted to conform to 561 the taxable year of the unitary combined group on the basis of 562 the number of months falling within the taxable year of the 563 unitary combined group. For example, if the taxable year of the 564 unitary combined group is a calendar year and a member operates 565 on a fiscal year ending on April 30, the income of the member 566 must include 8/12 of the income from the current taxable year 567 and 4/12 of the income from the preceding taxable year. This 568 method to determine the income of a member may be used only if 569 the return can be timely filed after the end of the taxable year 570 of the unitary combined group. 571 c.âThe taxable income of the member during its taxable year 572 that ends within the taxable year of the unitary combined group. 573 2.âThe method of determining the income of a member of a 574 unitary combined group whose taxable year does not correspond to 575 the taxable year of the unitary combined group may not change as 576 long as the member remains a member of the unitary combined 577 group. The apportionment factors for the member must be applied 578 to the income of the member for the taxable year of the unitary 579 combined group. 580 (4)(a)âA unitary combined group return must include a 581 computational schedule that does all of the following: 582 1.âCombines the adjusted federal income of all members of 583 the unitary combined group; 584 2.âShows all intercompany eliminations; 585 3.âShows Florida additions and subtractions under s. 586 220.13; and 587 4.âShows the calculation of the combined apportionment 588 factors. 589 (b)âIn addition to its return, a unitary combined group 590 shall also file a domestic disclosure spreadsheet. The 591 spreadsheet must fully disclose all of the following: 592 1.âThe income reported to each state in which the group 593 operates; 594 2.âThe combined state tax liability; 595 3.âThe method used for apportioning or allocating income to 596 each state in which the group operates; and 597 4.âOther information required by department rule in order 598 to determine the proper amount of tax due to each state and to 599 identify the unitary combined group. 600 (5)âThe executive director of the department may take any 601 of the following actions if he or she believes such action is 602 necessary to prevent substantial tax avoidance by the unitary 603 combined group: 604 (a)âAdd the income or apportionment factors of a related 605 entity to the unitary combined group return if the related 606 entity is not subject to corporate income tax. 607 (b)âAdjust the income or apportionment factor of a member 608 of the unitary combined group if such member is subject to 609 industry-specific apportionment rules. 610 (6)âThe department may adopt rules and forms to administer 611 this section. The Legislature intends to grant the department 612 extensive authority to adopt rules and forms describing and 613 defining principles for determining the existence of a unitary 614 combined group, definitions of common control, methods of 615 reporting, and related forms, principles, and other definitions. 616 Section 6.âSubsections (2), (3), and (4) of section 220.14, 617 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 618 220.14âExemption.â 619 (2)âIn the case of a taxable year for a period of less than 620 12 months, the exemption allowed by this section must shall be 621 prorated on the basis of the number of days in such year to 365 622 days, or, in a leap year, 366 days. 623 (3)âOnly one exemption is shall be allowed to taxpayers 624 filing a unitary combined group consolidated return under this 625 code. 626 (4)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this code, not 627 more than one exemption under this section may be allowed to the 628 Florida members of a controlled group of corporations, as 629 defined in s. 1563 of the Internal Revenue Code with respect to 630 taxable years ending on or after December 31, 1970, filing 631 separate returns under this code. The exemption described in 632 this section must shall be divided equally among such Florida 633 members of the group, unless all of such members consent, at 634 such time and in such manner as the department shall by 635 regulation prescribe, to an apportionment plan providing for an 636 unequal allocation of such exemption. 637 Section 7.âParagraphs (b) and (c) of subsection (5) of 638 section 220.15, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 639 220.15âApportionment of adjusted federal income.â 640 (5)âThe sales factor is a fraction the numerator of which 641 is the total sales of the taxpayer in this state during the 642 taxable year or period and the denominator of which is the total 643 sales of the taxpayer everywhere during the taxable year or 644 period. 645 (b)1.âSales of tangible personal property occur in this 646 state if: 647 a.âThe property is delivered or shipped to a purchaser, 648 other than the United States Government, within this state, 649 regardless of the f.o.b. point, other conditions of the sale, or 650 ultimate destination of the property, unless shipment is made 651 via a common or contract carrier; or 652 b.âThe property is shipped from an office, a store, a 653 warehouse, a factory, or other place of storage in this state, 654 and the purchaser is the United States Government or the 655 taxpayer is not taxable in the purchaserâs state. 656 657 However, for industries in NAICS National Number 311411, if the 658 ultimate destination of the product is to a location outside 659 this state, regardless of the method of shipment or f.o.b. 660 point, the sale shall not be deemed to occur in this state. As 661 used in this paragraph, âNAICSâ means those classifications 662 contained in the North American Industry Classification System, 663 as published in 2007 by the Office of Management and Budget, 664 Executive Office of the President. 665 2.âWhen citrus fruit is delivered by a cooperative for a 666 grower-member, by a grower-member to a cooperative, or by a 667 grower-participant to a Florida processor, the sales factor for 668 the growers for such citrus fruit delivered to such processor 669 shall be the same as the sales factor for the most recent 670 taxable year of that processor. That sales factor, expressed 671 only as a percentage and not in terms of the dollar volume of 672 sales, so as to protect the confidentiality of the sales of the 673 processor, shall be furnished on the request of such a grower 674 promptly after it has been determined for that taxable year. 675 3.âReimbursement of expenses under an agency contract 676 between a cooperative, a grower-member of a cooperative, or a 677 grower and a processor is not a sale within this state. 678 (c)âSales of a financial organization, including, but not 679 limited to, banking and savings institutions, investment 680 companies, real estate investment trusts, and brokerage 681 companies, occur in this state if derived from: 682 1.âFees, commissions, or other compensation for financial 683 services rendered within this state; 684 2.âGross profits from trading in stocks, bonds, or other 685 securities managed within this state; 686 3.âInterest received within this state, other than interest 687 from loans secured by mortgages, deeds of trust, or other liens 688 upon real or tangible personal property located without this 689 state, and dividends received within this state; 690 4.âInterest charged to customers at places of business 691 maintained within this state for carrying debit balances of 692 margin accounts, without deduction of any costs incurred in 693 carrying such accounts; 694 5.âInterest, fees, commissions, or other charges or gains 695 from loans secured by mortgages, deeds of trust, or other liens 696 upon real or tangible personal property located in this state or 697 from installment sale agreements originally executed by a 698 taxpayer or the taxpayerâs agent to sell real or tangible 699 personal property located in this state; 700 6.âRents from real or tangible personal property located in 701 this state; or 702 7.âAny other gross income, including other interest, 703 resulting from the operation as a financial organization within 704 this state. 705 706 In computing the amounts under this paragraph, any amount 707 received by a member of an affiliated group (determined under s. 708 1504(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, but without reference to 709 whether any such corporation is an âincludable corporationâ 710 under s. 1504(b) of the Internal Revenue Code) from another 711 member of such group shall be included only to the extent such 712 amount exceeds expenses of the recipient directly related 713 thereto. 714 Section 8.âParagraph (f) of subsection (1) of section 715 220.183, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 716 220.183âCommunity contribution tax credit.â 717 (1)âAUTHORIZATION TO GRANT COMMUNITY CONTRIBUTION TAX 718 CREDITS; LIMITATIONS ON INDIVIDUAL CREDITS AND PROGRAM 719 SPENDING.â 720 (f)âA taxpayer who files a Florida consolidated return as a 721 member of an affiliated group pursuant to s. 220.131(1) may be 722 allowed the credit on a consolidated return basis. 723 Section 9.âParagraphs (b), (c), and (d) of subsection (2) 724 of section 220.1845, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 725 220.1845âContaminated site rehabilitation tax credit.â 726 (2)âAUTHORIZATION FOR TAX CREDIT; LIMITATIONS.â 727 (b)âA tax credit applicant, or multiple tax credit 728 applicants working jointly to clean up a single site, may not be 729 granted more than $500,000 per year in tax credits for each site 730 voluntarily rehabilitated. Multiple tax credit applicants shall 731 be granted tax credits in the same proportion as their 732 contribution to payment of cleanup costs. Subject to the same 733 conditions and limitations as provided in this section, a 734 municipality, county, or other tax credit applicant which 735 voluntarily rehabilitates a site may receive not more than 736 $500,000 per year in tax credits which it can subsequently 737 transfer subject to the provisions in paragraph (f) (g). 738 (c)âIf the credit granted under this section is not fully 739 used in any one year because of insufficient tax liability on 740 the part of the corporation, the unused amount may be carried 741 forward for up to 5 years. The carryover credit may be used in a 742 subsequent year if the tax imposed by this chapter for that year 743 exceeds the credit for which the corporation is eligible in that 744 year after applying the other credits and unused carryovers in 745 the order provided by s. 220.02(8). If during the 5-year period 746 the credit is transferred, in whole or in part, pursuant to 747 paragraph (f) (g), each transferee has 5 years after the date of 748 transfer to use its credit. 749 (d)âA taxpayer that files a consolidated return in this 750 state as a member of an affiliated group under s. 220.131(1) may 751 be allowed the credit on a consolidated return basis up to the 752 amount of tax imposed upon the consolidated group. 753 Section 10.âSubsection (2) of section 220.1875, Florida 754 Statutes, is amended to read: 755 220.1875âCredit for contributions to eligible nonprofit 756 scholarship-funding organizations.â 757 (2)âA taxpayer who files a Florida consolidated return as a 758 member of an affiliated group pursuant to s. 220.131(1) may be 759 allowed the credit on a consolidated return basis; however, the 760 total credit taken by the affiliated group is subject to the 761 limitation established under subsection (1). 762 Section 11.âSubsection (2) of section 220.1876, Florida 763 Statutes, is amended to read: 764 220.1876âCredit for contributions to the New Worlds Reading 765 Initiative.â 766 (2)âA taxpayer who files a Florida consolidated return as a 767 member of an affiliated group pursuant to s. 220.131(1) may be 768 allowed the credit on a consolidated return basis; however, the 769 total credit taken by the affiliated group is subject to the 770 limitation established under subsection (1). 771 Section 12.âSubsection (2) of section 220.1877, Florida 772 Statutes, is amended to read: 773 220.1877âCredit for contributions to eligible charitable 774 organizations.â 775 (2)âA taxpayer who files a Florida consolidated return as a 776 member of an affiliated group pursuant to s. 220.131(1) may be 777 allowed the credit on a consolidated return basis; however, the 778 total credit taken by the affiliated group is subject to the 779 limitation established under subsection (1). 780 Section 13.âSubsection (2) of section 220.18775, Florida 781 Statutes, is amended to read: 782 220.18775âCredit for contributions to eligible charitable 783 organizations for the Home Away From Home Tax Credit.â 784 (2)âA taxpayer who files a Florida consolidated return as a 785 member of an affiliated group pursuant to s. 220.131(1) may be 786 allowed the credit on a consolidated return basis; however, the 787 total credit taken by the affiliated group is subject to the 788 limitation established under subsection (1). 789 Section 14.âSubsection (2) of section 220.1878, Florida 790 Statutes, is amended to read: 791 220.1878âCredit for contributions to the Live Local 792 Program.â 793 (2)âA taxpayer who files a Florida consolidated return as a 794 member of an affiliated group pursuant to s. 220.131(1) may be 795 allowed the credit on a consolidated return basis; however, the 796 total credit taken by the affiliated group is subject to the 797 limitation established under subsection (1). 798 Section 15.âSubsection (2) of section 220.19, Florida 799 Statutes, is amended to read: 800 220.19âChild care tax credits.â 801 (2)âA taxpayer that files a consolidated return in this 802 state as a member of an affiliated group under s. 220.131(1) may 803 be allowed the credit on a consolidated return basis; however, 804 the total credit taken by the affiliated group is subject to the 805 limitation established under s. 402.261(2)(d). 806 Section 16.âParagraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (3) of 807 section 220.191, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 808 220.191âCapital investment tax credit.â 809 (3)(a)âNotwithstanding subsection (2), an annual credit 810 against the tax imposed by this chapter shall be granted to a 811 qualifying business which establishes a qualifying project 812 pursuant to subparagraph (1)(h)3., in an amount equal to the 813 lesser of $15 million or 5 percent of the eligible capital costs 814 made in connection with a qualifying project, for a period not 815 to exceed 20 years beginning with the commencement of operations 816 of the project. The tax credit shall be granted against the 817 corporate income tax liability of the qualifying business and as 818 further provided in paragraph (c). The total tax credit provided 819 pursuant to this subsection shall be equal to no more than 100 820 percent of the eligible capital costs of the qualifying project. 821 (c)âThe credit granted under this subsection may be used in 822 whole or in part by the qualifying business or any corporation 823 that is either a member of that qualifying businessâs affiliated 824 group of corporations, is a related entity taxable as a 825 cooperative under subchapter T of the Internal Revenue Code, or, 826 if the qualifying business is an entity taxable as a cooperative 827 under subchapter T of the Internal Revenue Code, is related to 828 the qualifying business. Any entity related to the qualifying 829 business may continue to file as a member of a Florida-nexus 830 consolidated group pursuant to a prior election made under s. 831 220.131(1), Florida Statutes (1985), even if the parent of the 832 group changes due to a direct or indirect acquisition of the 833 former common parent of the group. Any credit can be used by any 834 of the affiliated companies or related entities referenced in 835 this paragraph to the same extent as it could have been used by 836 the qualifying business. However, any such use shall not operate 837 to increase the amount of the credit or extend the period within 838 which the credit must be used. 839 Section 17.âParagraph (a) of subsection (4) of section 840 220.1991, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 841 220.1991âCredit for manufacturing of human breast milk 842 derived human milk fortifiers.â 843 (4)(a)âA taxpayer who files a Florida consolidated return 844 as a member of an affiliated group pursuant to s. 220.131(1) may 845 be allowed the credit on a consolidated return basis. 846 Section 18.âSection 220.51, Florida Statutes, is amended to 847 read: 848 220.51âAdoption Promulgation of rules and regulations.âIn 849 accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 120, 850 the department is authorized to make, adopt promulgate, and 851 enforce such reasonable rules and regulations, and to prescribe 852 such forms relating to the administration and enforcement of the 853 provisions of this code, as it may deem appropriate, including: 854 (1)âRules for initial implementation of this code and for 855 taxpayersâ transitional taxable years commencing before and 856 ending after January 1, 1972; and 857 (2)âRules or regulations to clarify whether certain groups, 858 organizations, or associations formed under the laws of this 859 state or any other state, country, or jurisdiction shall be 860 deemed âtaxpayersâ for the purposes of this code, in accordance 861 with the legislative declarations of intent in s. 220.02; and 862 (3)âRegulations relating to consolidated reporting for 863 affiliated groups of corporations, in order to provide for an 864 equitable and just administration of this code with respect to 865 multicorporate taxpayers. 866 Section 19.âSection 220.64, Florida Statutes, is amended to 867 read: 868 220.64âOther provisions applicable to franchise tax.âTo the 869 extent that they are not manifestly incompatible with the 870 provisions of this part, parts I, III, IV, V, VI, VIII, IX, and 871 X of this code and ss. 220.12, 220.13, 220.136, 220.1363, 872 220.15, and 220.16 apply to the franchise tax imposed by this 873 part. Under rules prescribed by the department in s. 220.131, a 874 consolidated return may be filed by any affiliated group of 875 corporations composed of one or more banks or savings 876 associations, its or their Florida parent corporations 877 corporation, and any nonbank or nonsavings subsidiaries of such 878 parent corporations corporation. 879 Section 20.âSubsections (9) and (10) of section 376.30781, 880 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 881 376.30781âTax credits for rehabilitation of drycleaning 882 solvent-contaminated sites and brownfield sites in designated 883 brownfield areas; application process; rulemaking authority; 884 revocation authority.â 885 (9)âOn or before June 1, the Department of Environmental 886 Protection shall inform each tax credit applicant subject to the 887 January 31 annual application deadline of the applicantâs 888 eligibility status and the amount of any tax credit due. The 889 department shall provide each eligible tax credit applicant with 890 a tax credit certificate that must be submitted with its tax 891 return to the Department of Revenue to claim the tax credit or 892 be transferred pursuant to s. 220.1845(2)(f) s. 220.1845(2)(g). 893 The June 1 deadline for annual site rehabilitation tax credit 894 certificate awards does not apply to any tax credit application 895 for which the department has issued a notice of deficiency 896 pursuant to subsection (8). The department shall respond within 897 120 days after receiving a response from the tax credit 898 applicant to such a notice of deficiency. Credits may not result 899 in the payment of refunds if total credits exceed the amount of 900 tax owed. 901 (10)âFor solid waste removal, new health care facility or 902 health care provider, and affordable housing tax credit 903 applications, the Department of Environmental Protection shall 904 inform the applicant of the departmentâs determination within 90 905 days after the application is deemed complete. Each eligible tax 906 credit applicant shall be informed of the amount of its tax 907 credit and provided with a tax credit certificate that must be 908 submitted with its tax return to the Department of Revenue to 909 claim the tax credit or be transferred pursuant to s. 910 220.1845(2)(f) s. 220.1845(2)(g). Credits may not result in the 911 payment of refunds if total credits exceed the amount of tax 912 owed. 913 Section 21.âTransitional rules.â 914 (1)âFor the first taxable year beginning on or after 915 January 1, 2027, a taxpayer that filed a Florida corporate 916 income tax return in the preceding taxable year and that is a 917 member of a unitary combined group shall compute its income 918 together with all members of its unitary combined group and file 919 a combined Florida corporate income tax return with all members 920 of its unitary combined group. 921 (2)âAn affiliated group of corporations which filed a 922 Florida consolidated corporate income tax return pursuant to an 923 election provided in former s. 220.131, Florida Statutes, shall 924 cease filing a Florida consolidated return for taxable years 925 beginning on or after January 1, 2027, and shall file a combined 926 Florida corporate income tax return with all members of its 927 unitary combined group. 928 (3)âAn affiliated group of corporations which filed a 929 Florida consolidated corporate income tax return pursuant to the 930 election in former s. 220.131(1), Florida Statutes (1985), which 931 allowed the affiliated group to make an election within 90 days 932 after December 20, 1984, or upon filing the taxpayerâs first 933 return after December 20, 1984, whichever was later, shall cease 934 filing a Florida consolidated corporate income tax return using 935 that method for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 936 2027, and shall file a combined Florida corporate income tax 937 return with all members of its unitary combined group. 938 (4)âA taxpayer that is not a member of a unitary combined 939 group remains subject to chapter 220, Florida Statutes, and 940 shall file a separate Florida corporate income tax return as 941 previously required. 942 (5)âFor taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 943 2027, a tax return for a member of a unitary combined group must 944 be a combined Florida corporate income tax return that includes 945 tax information for all members of the unitary combined group. 946 The tax return must be filed by a member that has nexus with 947 this state. 948 Section 22.âAny additional revenue received as a result of 949 the enactment of this act must be deposited into the General 950 Revenue Fund. 951 Section 23.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.